Louisiana, session 2026, HB1123.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 48:79 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§79. Transportation Backlog Fund
A. The legislature recognizes that the contributions of certain parishes to the
state general fund in the form of severance tax revenue far exceeds the benefits that
these parishes receive. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to establish a more
equitable distribution of revenue to promote the development of transportation
infrastructure in these parishes and the development of oil, gas, and other revenue-
generating industries.
B. There is hereby established in the state treasury, as a special fund, the
Transportation Backlog Fund, hereinafter referred to as the "fund".
C. The treasurer is authorized to transfer and deposit twenty million dollars
of state general fund monies into the fund after compliance with the requirements of
Article VII, Section 9(B) of the Constitution of Louisiana relative to the Bond
Security and Redemption Fund to be used solely as provided for in Subsection E of
this Section.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2724 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1123
D. The monies in the fund shall be invested in the same manner as monies in
the state general fund. Interest earned on the investment of monies in the fund shall
be credited to the fund. Unexpended and unencumbered monies in the fund at the
end of the fiscal year shall remain in the fund.
E. Monies in the fund shall be utilized for transportation infrastructure
projects which are located entirely within a parish that has received the maximum
severance tax allocation for all natural resources other than sulphur, lignite, or timber
pursuant to Article VII, Section 4(D) of the Constitution of Louisiana for the current
fiscal year and which are included in the Highway Priority Program, Port
Construction or Development Priority Program, Airport Construction or
Development Priority Program, or Federal Railroad Crossing Safety Program. Any
project to be funded pursuant to this Section shall be subject to approval by the Joint
Committee on Transportation, Highways, and Public Works prior to distribution of
monies from the fund to the project.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.